Hawaii statutes.
§286-22 Inspection by officers of the
police department. [Section effective January 1, 2017. For section
effective until December 31, 2016, see main volume.] (a) The chief of
police or any police officer of any county may, at any time when the chief of
police or police officer has reasonable cause to believe that a vehicle or
moped is unsafe or not equipped as required by law, require the owner or driver
of the vehicle or moped to submit the vehicle or moped to an inspection or make
the necessary corrections or repairs.

(b) If the vehicle or moped is found to be in
an unsafe condition or if any required part or equipment is not present or if
any required part or equipment is present but not in proper repair, the officer
shall issue a citation to the owner or driver stating the reasons that the
vehicle or moped is deemed unsafe or is not equipped as required and shall
require that a new certificate of inspection as provided in section 286-26 be
obtained within five days or that the defect be cured.

(c) If upon inspection, the chief of police or
any police officer determines that any vehicle or moped is in such unsafe
condition as to constitute a menace to the public or is not equipped as
required and cannot reasonably be restored to a safe condition as required in
this part, the chief of police or police officer shall remove the sticker which
signifies the certificate of inspection and inform the director of finance who
shall immediately suspend the registration of the vehicle or moped and give
notice of the suspension to its owner. Whenever the director of finance has
suspended the registration of any vehicle or moped under this part, the owner
of the vehicle or moped shall immediately surrender and forward to the director
of finance the certificate of registration and the license plates last issued
upon registration of the vehicle for the current year.

(d) Any person aggrieved by this section shall
have the right to a hearing before a district judge of the circuit in which the
person is cited within five days. The judge shall determine whether the chief
of police or any police officer reasonably performed the chief of police's or
police officer's duties hereunder and shall make any appropriate order. [L
1967, c 214, pt of §2; HRS §286-22; am L 1970, c 188, §§39, 40; gen ch 1985; am
L 2016, c 200, §8]

Revision Note

"Director of finance" substituted for
"treasurer" to conform to county charters.

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next